Hawaii, session 2025, GM1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the public utilities
commission provides critical services that ensure access to a
basic set of essential telecommunications services for
individuals who are blind or visually impaired.
In 1995, the legislature established the universal service
program, the purpose of which, in relevant part, is to help
customers with disabilities access and maintain a basic set of
essential telecommunications services as determined by the
commission. By law, all telecommunications carriers are
required to contribute to this program. However, the universal
service program is currently inactive with no funds available in
the universal service fund. Moreover, the public utilities
commission lacks clear legislative authority to develop a
program addressing print disability through the universal
service fund and does not have budget authorization to expend
funds for this purpose.
2025-3329 HB1052 GDI HMSO
IIIIBIMIHHIilHIIIIil

Page 2 H.B. NO. ■
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide clearer
authorization and guidance for the public utilities commission
to implement and manage the universal service program
effectively, using funds from the universal service fund.
SECTION 2. Section 269-41, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§269-41 [^] Universal service program; establishment;
pui^jose; principles. There is established the universal service
program. The purpose of this program is to:
(1) Maintain affordable, just, and reasonable rates for
basic residential telecommunications service, as
defined by the commission;
(2) Assist customers located in the areas of the State
that have high costs of essential telecommunications
service, low-income customers, and customers with
disabilities, in obtaining and maintaining access to a
basic set of essential telecommunications services as
determined by the commission. The commission may
expand or otherwise modify relevant programs, such as
the lifeline program under section 269-16.5;
2025-3329 HB1052 GDI HMSO 2
■imiiiHniMiH

Page 3 H.B. NO. ■
. C.D. 1
(3) Ensure that consumers in all communities are provided
with access, at reasonably comparable rates, to all
telecommunications services [whieh] that are used by a
majority of consumers located in metropolitan areas of
the State. The commission shall provide for a
reasonable transition period to support the statewide
deployment of these advanced telecommunications
services, including[—] but not limited to[—] the use
of strategic community access points in public
facilities_^ such as education, library, and health
care facilities;
(4) Ensure that consumers are given the information
necessary to make informed choices among the
alternative telecommunications carriers and services;
[aftd]
(5) Promote affordable access throughout the State to
enhanced government information and services,
including education, health care, public safety, and
other government services[—]; and
(6) Ensure access to essential telecommunications services
for individuals with print disabilities, including
2025-3329 HB1052 CDl HMSO
nininimiiiHiimi

Page 4 H.B. NO. 1052
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
providing free, print-disability-friendly telephonic
access to time-sensitive information for individuals
who are blind or visually impaired. For the purposes
of this paragraph, "time-sensitive information"
includes state and government information, public
notices, emergency alerts, job opportunities, and
daily newspapers.
The commission shall administer the universal service
program, including the establishment of criteria by which the
purposes of the program are met."
SECTION 3. Section 269-42, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (a) and (b) to read:
"(a) There is established outside of the state treasury a
special fund to be known as the universal service fund to be
administered by the commission to implement the policies and
goals of universal service[—] through the universal service
program. The fund shall consist of contributions from the
sources identified in subsections (e) and (f). Interest earned
from the balance of the fund shall become a part of the fund.
The commission shall adopt rules regarding the distribution of
2025-3329 HB1052 CDl HMSO
■lUMIIHMIIIIIIIIIII

H.B. NO.
. g 2
i . i-x . 1 ’I
C.D. 1
moneys from the fund including reimbursements to carriers for
providing reduced rates to low-income, elderly, residents of
underserved or rural areas, or other subscribers, as authorized
by the commission.
(b) The commission may use available funds in the fund to
provide free telephonic access to time-sensitive information for
individuals with print disabilities; provided that the amount of
funds expended from the fund for this purpose shall not exceed
$150,000. The commission may allow distribution of funds from
the fund directly to customers based upon a need criteria
established by the commission."
2. By amending subsection (f) to read:
"(f) The commission shall designate the method by which
the contributions under subsection (e) shall be calculated and
collected. The commission shall consider basing contributions
solely on the gross operating revenues from the retail provision
of intrastate telecommunications services offered by the
telecommunications carriers subject to the contribution. The
commission may determine the percentage of telecommunications
fees to be contributed to the universal service fund."
2025-3329 HB1052 GDI HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3329 HB1052 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO 1052
APPROVED this 9th day of June , 2025
X
CO
d
Q
Q
Q
ACTING GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1052, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1052, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
166